apertium-is-en.is.dix
    <pardef n="þér/un__n">
      <e>       <p><l>un</l>        <r>un<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>unin</l>      <r>un<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>anir</l>      <r>un<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>anirnar</l>   <r>un<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>un</l>        <r>un<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>unina</l>     <r>un<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>anir</l>      <r>un<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>anirnar</l>   <r>un<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>un</l>        <r>un<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>uninni</l>    <r>un<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>unum</l>      <r>un<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ununum</l>    <r>un<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>unar</l>      <r>un<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>unarinnar</l> <r>un<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ana</l>       <r>un<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ananna</l>    <r>un<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="st/arf__n">
      <e>       <p><l>arf</l>       <r>arf<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>arfið</l>     <r>arf<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>örf</l>       <r>arf<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>örfin</l>     <r>arf<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>arf</l>       <r>arf<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>arfið</l>     <r>arf<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>örf</l>       <r>arf<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>örfin</l>     <r>arf<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>arfi</l>      <r>arf<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>arfinu</l>    <r>arf<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>örfum</l>     <r>arf<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>örfunum</l>   <r>arf<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>arfs</l>      <r>arf<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>arfsins</l>   <r>arf<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>arfa</l>      <r>arf<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>arfanna</l>   <r>arf<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="þum/all__n">
      <e>       <p><l>all</l>       <r>all<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>allinn</l>    <r>all<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>lar</l>       <r>all<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>larnir</l>    <r>all<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>al</l>        <r>all<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>alinn</l>     <r>all<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>la</l>        <r>all<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>lana</l>      <r>all<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>li</l>        <r>all<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>linum</l>     <r>all<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>lum</l>       <r>all<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>lunum</l>     <r>all<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>als</l>       <r>all<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>alsins</l>    <r>all<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>la</l>        <r>all<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>lanna</l>     <r>all<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="hell/ir__n">
      <e>       <p><l>ir</l>        <r>ir<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>irinn</l>     <r>ir<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ar</l>        <r>ir<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>arnir</l>     <r>ir<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>ir<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>inn</l>       <r>ir<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>ir<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ana</l>       <r>ir<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>ir<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>inum</l>      <r>ir<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>um</l>        <r>ir<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>unum</l>      <r>ir<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>is</l>        <r>ir<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>isins</l>     <r>ir<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>ir<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>anna</l>      <r>ir<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    

    <e lm="affosfórun">      <i>affosfór</i><par n="þér/un__n"/></e>
    <e lm="þumall">          <i>þum</i><par n="þum/all__n"/></e>
    <e lm="greinir">         <i>grein</i><par n="hell/ir__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stoppun">         <i>stopp</i><par n="þér/un__n"/></e>
    <e lm="byrjun">          <i>byrj</i><par n="þér/un__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bilun">           <i>bil</i><par n="þér/un__n"/></e>
    <e lm="grunnendurlífgun"><i>grunnendurlífg</i><par n="þér/un__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skoðun">          <i>skoð</i><par n="þér/un__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tilviljun">       <i>tilvilj</i><par n="þér/un__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bótúlíneitrun">   <i>bótúlíneitr</i><par n="þér/un__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hugsun">          <i>hugs</i><par n="þér/un__n"/></e>
    <e lm="endurlífgun">     <i>endurlífg</i><par n="þér/un__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eitrun">          <i>eitr</i><par n="þér/un__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sperðileitrun">   <i>sperðileitr</i><par n="þér/un__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hjartastillir">   <i>hjartastill</i><par n="hell/ir__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hellir">          <i>hell</i><par n="hell/ir__n"/></e>
    <e lm="matareitrun">     <i>matareitr</i><par n="þér/un__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sláttarstöðvun">  <i>sláttarstöðv</i><par n="þér/un__n"/></e>
    <e lm="huggun">          <i>hugg</i><par n="þér/un__n"/></e>
    <e lm="þérun">           <i>þér</i><par n="þér/un__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stöðvun">         <i>stöðv</i><par n="þér/un__n"/></e>
    <e lm="starf">           <i>st</i><par n="st/arf__n"/></e>
    <e lm="áætlun">          <i>áætl</i><par n="þér/un__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fosfórun">        <i>fosfór</i><par n="þér/un__n"/></e>
    <e lm="blóðfrumnamyndun"><i>blóðfrumnamynd</i><par n="þér/un__n"/></e>
    <e lm="læknir">          <i>lækn</i><par n="hell/ir__n"/></e>
